Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
PART 4 Unorganized Militia

38-2-70.
Organizations from unorganized militia; applicable regulations; enlistment and volunteers.

To the extent permitted by the Constitution and laws of the United States, the Governor may:

Order into active state service, recognize existing, or authorize the establishment of organizations of the unorganized militia, of designated classes thereof, or of volunteers therefor, as he may deem to be for the public interest;

Prescribe for those organizations enumerated in paragraph (1) of this Code section such parts of the regulations governing the organized militia as may be applicable thereto or establish such regulations therefor, or both, as he may deem proper; and

Provide for the separate organization of the unorganized militia and authorize the enlistment in such organizations of persons volunteering for such service who are not otherwise subject to military duty under Code Section 38-2-3.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 2; Code 1933, §§ 86-206, 86-210; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 9.

38-2-71.
Registration of members of unorganized militia.

Whenever he shall deem it necessary, the Governor may direct the members of the unorganized militia to present themselves for and submit to registration at such time and place and in such manner as may be prescribed by regulations issued pursuant to Code Section 38-2-110.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 2; Code 1933, § 86-202; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 5.

38-2-72.
Volunteers or draftees from unorganized militia serving in organized militia; draft of unorganized militia; compensation and duration of duty.

Whenever it is necessary in case of invasion, disaster, insurrection, riot, breach of the peace, or combination to oppose the enforcement of the law by force or violence, or imminent danger thereof, or whenever it is necessary to maintain the organized militia or any force thereof at the number required for public safety or prescribed by the laws of the United States, the Governor may call for and accept from the unorganized militia as many volunteers as are required for service in the organized militia or he may direct the members of the unorganized militia or such of them as may be necessary to be drafted into the organized militia or any force thereof.

Whenever it is necessary in time of war or in case of invasion, disaster, or other like emergency, or imminent danger thereof, the Governor may direct the members of the unorganized militia or such of them as may be necessary to be drafted under such regulations as he may prescribe into the active service of the state and to serve as directed by him.

Whenever members of the unorganized militia are drafted into the active service of the state, they shall serve for such period as the Governor may direct, not to exceed the duration of the emergency for which they may be drafted. The compensation of all members of the unorganized militia, while on duty or assembled pursuant to this Code section, shall be paid in the manner prescribed by Code Section 38-2-250.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 2; Code 1933, § 86-205; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, §§ 11, 12; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 10.

Cross references.

Emergency powers of Governor generally, §§

38-3-22

,

38-3-51

, 45-12-29 et seq.

38-2-73.
Failure to appear for registration or draft; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any member of the unorganized militia who is ordered to register or to be drafted under Code Sections 38-2-71 and 38-2-72 to fail to appear at the time and place designated in such order.

Any person who commits the offense described in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 2; Code 1933, § 86-208; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 15; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, §§ 11, 106.